Mississippi, session 2026, HB867.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 51-9-165, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 51-9-165.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Ross Barnett Reservoir Dredging and Maintenance Fund.  The fund shall consist of the monies deposited into the fund as provided in subsection (2) of this section and any other monies appropriated or otherwise made available for the fund by the Legislature.  The fund shall be administered and expended by the Board of Directors of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for dredging and other related activities to remove sediments and debris from the bottom of the Ross Barnett Reservoir, and for shoreline maintenance and other related activities to prevent or mitigate erosion of the shoreline. (2)  During fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Board of Directors of the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District may deposit not more than Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) of the lease payments, fees and other funds received by the district during the fiscal year into the Ross Barnett Dredging and Maintenance Fund. (3)  Unexpended amounts remaining in the Ross Barnett Dredging and Maintenance Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.